Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-537
Registration of foreign protected series.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section and subject to sections 21-521 and 21-523, the law of this state governing the registration of a foreign limited liability company to do business in this state, including the consequences of not complying with that law, applies to a foreign protected series of a foreign series limited liability company as if the foreign protected series were a foreign limited liability company formed separately from the foreign series limited liability company and distinct from the foreign series limited liability company and any other foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company.

(b) An application by a foreign protected series of a foreign series limited liability company for registration to do business in this state must include:

(1) the name and jurisdiction of formation of the foreign series limited liability company; and

(2) if the company has other foreign protected series, the name and street and mailing address of an individual who knows the name and street and mailing address of:

(A) each other foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company; and

(B) the foreign protected-series manager of and agent for service of process for each other foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company.

(c) The name of a foreign protected series applying for registration or registered to do business in this state must comply with section 21-510 and may do so using subdivision (b)(2) of section 21-108, if the fictitious name complies with section 21-510.

(d) The requirement in subdivision (a)(5) and subsection (c) of section 21-114, subsection (e) of section 21-118, section 21-122, subsection (d) of section 21-125, and section 21-173 to amend a statement of registration to update information applies to the information required by subsection (b) of this section.

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 38.
January 1, 2021